Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.195

Supplemental appropriations of unanticipated funds from local sources.

In addition to the supplemental appropriations provided in RCW 36.40.100 and 36.40.140, the county legislative authority may provide by resolution a policy for supplemental appropriations as a result of unanticipated funds from local revenue sources.

[ 1997 c 204 s 4.]